District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

36-302.22

Retail service station security public service announcement.

Recodified as § 36-301.22.

History

Apr. 19, 1977 D.C. Law 1-123, § 3-122
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-65, § 2, 56 DCR 6606